District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.01

General authorization.

(a)

The advanced practice registered nurse may perform actions of medical diagnosis, treatment, prescription, and other functions authorized by this subchapter.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 601, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(p), 42 DCR 457

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.1.